Washington statutes.
RCW 34.05.488

Brief proceedings—Administrative review—Applicability.

Unless prohibited by any provision of law, an agency, on its own motion, may conduct administrative review of an order resulting from brief adjudicative proceedings. An agency shall conduct this review upon the written or oral request of a party if the agency receives the request within twenty-one days after service of the written statement required by RCW 34.05.485(3).

[ 1989 c 175 s 24; 1988 c 288 s 427.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1989 c 175: See note following RCW 34.05.010.